extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
abolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
absorber/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acaudellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acostellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acuchellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
adormir/VbVfViVjVkVnVqVrVtGa
adunviar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afebrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aforar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agostar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alcontrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alendar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alpenzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
altravesar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amacellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amarellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amestar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amorcellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amormellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anochar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
antecoyer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
antever/VbVfVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apapellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apenzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aportellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apostar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aprobar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrastrellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arremelgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrepentir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVtGa
arreventar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrobellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arropellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asosegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atartamellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atorcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atronar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azarcellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
beldar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cascubellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cernir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
comenzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
concordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
consolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
corromper/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cuadrellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
deprender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desamoblar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desaprobar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descamellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descorrer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencontar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desengodobellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desensellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desestar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desgobernar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
despertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desprender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
destravesar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
devolver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
doler/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
empelgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emporcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emprobar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encomenzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encuadrellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enfolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engodobellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllamorgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enrestrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ensellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entestar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envergonzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escancellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escazabellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escontar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escorvellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esfoyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmolgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espedrar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esrabadellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
fender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
folgar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
garfellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
goyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
inxerir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVtGa
llover/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
marellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mentir/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
morrer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVt
mozcar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
orellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
pesllar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
poyar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
presllar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
probar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rancollar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recocer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recordar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
refertar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reforzar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remover/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repoblar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resonar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
retemblar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
revertir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
rodabellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
romper/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVt
sabadegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sentar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
solariegu/AaMaApAsAqYsSmNmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
soler/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sonar/SmNmYsVbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sorprender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
taramellar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
testar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tostar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trasegar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trescender/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tresferir/VbVfViVjVkVmVqVrVt
tresvolar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tropezar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
vengar/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
verter/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
volver/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVt
xoncer/VbVfVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
